Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-946.01
Counties; appropriate funds.

Counties may appropriate and expend funds for the purchase of materials, machinery and equipment to assist the districts organized under this section and section 2-946.02. Cities or villages may appropriate and expend funds for the purchase of materials, machinery and equipment to assist districts organized within their corporate limits.

Laws 1945, c. 2, § 22, p. 66.